Louisiana, session 2026, HB600.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1692(introductory paragraph) and (8)(introductory paragraph) and
(a) and 1703(A) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 22:1692(8)(c) is hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§1692. Definitions
As used in this Part, unless the context requires otherwise, the following
definitions shall be are applicable:
* * *
(8) "Public adjusting" means either any of the following:
(a) Investigating, appraising, or evaluating and reporting to an insured in
relation to a first-party claim for which coverage is provided by an insurance contract
that insures the property of the insured. Public adjusting does not include acting in
any manner in relation to claims for damages to or arising out of the operation of a
motor vehicle. Public adjusting does not include any activities which may constitute
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1112 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 600
the unauthorized practice of law. Nothing in this Part shall be considered as
permitting the unauthorized practice of law.
* * *
(c) Acting or aiding, solely in relation to first-party claims arising under
insurance contracts that insure the real or personal property of the insured, on behalf
of an insured in negotiating for, or effecting the settlement of, a claim for loss or
damage covered by an insurance contract. Public adjusting does not include acting
in any manner in relation to claims for damages to or arising out of the operation of
a motor vehicle. Public adjusting does not include any activities which may
constitute the unauthorized practice of law. Nothing in this Part shall be considered
as permitting the unauthorized practice of law.
* * *
§1703. Public adjuster fees
A. A public adjuster may charge the insured a reasonable fee. A public
adjuster shall not solicit for or enter into any contract or arrangement between an
insured and a public adjuster which provides for payment of a fee to the public
adjuster which is contingent upon, or calculated as a percentage of, the amount of
any claim or claims paid to or on behalf of an insured by the insurer and any such
contract shall be against public policy and is null and void. which exceeds ten
percent for any catastrophic insurance claim settlement or exceeds fifteen percent for
any insurance claim settlement.
* * *